Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Cross references. —

As to depositories for public moneys, see art. 15, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to liability of bank for various banking transactions by fiduciaries, see §§

2-3-204

through

2-3-207

.

As to succession of fiduciary powers when bank consolidates with another, see §

2-3-208

.

As to state deposits and depositories, see §

9-4-801

et seq.

For Wyoming Business Corporation Act, see chapter 16 of title 17.

As to collection agencies, see chapter 11 of title 33.

For Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, see chapter 14 of title 34.

For Uniform Commercial Code, see title 34.1.

For Uniform Consumer Credit Code, see chapter 14 of title 40.

As to the applicability of the Wyoming Money Transmitters Act to this title, see § 40-22-104(a)(iv).

Revision of title. —

Laws 1977, ch. 67, §§ 1 and 3, revised this title, enacting §§

13-1-101

through

13-2-208

and

13-2-301

through

13-10-111

, and repealing, with certain exceptions, §§ 13-1 through 13-101 and 13-105 through 13-279.1, W.S. 1957. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1977 Act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations have been added to the revised sections.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 2, redesignated §§ 13-102 through 13-104 and 13-477, W.S. 1957, as §§ 9-619.1 through 9-619.3 and

40-1-107

(5), W.S. 1957, respectively.

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 4, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 5, provides: “If any other act of the legislature enacted during the same session in which this act is enacted is in conflict with the provisions of this act, the other act shall prevail in all cases to the extent of such conflict, regardless of whether enacted before or after the enactment of this act.”

Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 6, provides: “This act is effective July 1, 1977.”

Sections

13-2-203

through

13-2-208

of the revised title, which concerned the duties of the state examiner regarding the chartering of banks, were repealed by Laws 1977, ch. 177, § 3. Sections

13-2-209

through 13-2-221, which were enacted by Laws 1977, ch. 177, § 1, were redesignated as §§

13-2-203

through

13-2-215

in order to maintain proper numerical sequence.

Section 13-6-103 of the revised title, which concerned the approval of the state examiner regarding the chartering of savings and loan associations, was repealed by Laws 1977, ch. 177, § 3.

Section 13-64, W.S. 1957, was amended by Laws 1977, ch. 67, effective prior to the revision of this title.

Sections 13-44(c), 13-45, 13-46 and 13-218, W.S. 1957, were repealed by Laws 1977, ch. 177, § 3, prior to the revision of this title.

Financial institutions may not generally exercise powers notexpressly authorized. —

Since financial institutions are so closely regulated, generally they may not exercise any powers which are not expressly authorized by statute. Wyoming Trust & Management v. Bonham, 694 P.2d 106,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 430

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of bank, to other than party whose financial condition is misrepresented, for erroneous credit information furnished by bank or its directors, officers or employees, 77 ALR3d 6.

Contingency as to borrower's receipt of money or other property from which loan is to be repaid as rendering loan usurious, 92 ALR3d 623.

Leaving part of loan on deposit with lender as usury, 92 ALR3d 769.

Enforceability of provision in loan commitment agreement authorizing lender to charge standby fee, commitment fee or similar deposit, 93 ALR3d 1156.

Validity, construction, and effect of “regulatory exclusion” in directors' and officers' liability insurance policy, 21 ALR5th 292.

Effect of federal Home Mortgage Disclosure Act of 1975 (12 USC §§ 2801-2809) on enforcement of state disclosure and antiredlining statutes against federal financial institutions, 57 ALR Fed 322.

Rights and obligations of federal government, under 20 USC § 1080, when student borrower defaults on federally insured loan, 73 ALR Fed 303.

Exclusion from debtor status of banks and the like by § 109(b)(2) of Bankruptcy Code (11 USC § 109(b)(2)), 87 ALR Fed 282.

Construction and application of preemption exemption, under Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC § 1001 et seq.), for state laws regulating insurance, banking or securities (29 USC § 1144(b)(2)), 87 ALR Fed 797.

47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 412 to 423.